District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-218.22

Functions of the Commission.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2322, 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2062(c), 54 DCR 7052
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(d), 57 DCR 1485
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(f), 61 DCR 3892

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-218.13 and § 2-218.75.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-20 rewrote pars. (1) and (2), which had read as follows: “(1) Determine a business enterprise’s or joint venture’s eligibility for certification under part D and review and determine the continued eligibility of business enterprises and joint ventures certified by the Commission; (2) Determine the percentage of the amount of a joint venture which may be attributed toward an agency’s percentage goal; and”
D.C. Law 18-141 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The Commission shall: (1) Hear all requested appeals by business enterprises upon the denial of an application for initial certification, reinstatement, or renewal by the Department; (2) Perform regular and routine aud Department’s certification process through a random review of 5 applications per month; and (3) Repeal and suspend the certification of a business enterprise pursuant to § 2-218.63.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2322 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2062(c) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108(b) provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.